Utah statutes.
10-1-407.    Attributing the gross receipts from telecommunications service
to a municipality -- Rate impact.
(1)  The gross receipts from a telecommunications service are attributed to a
municipality if the gross receipts are from a transaction for
telecommunications service that is located within the municipality:
(a)  for purposes of sales and use taxes under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and
Use Tax Act; and
(b)  determined in accordance with Section 59-12-215.
(2) (a)  The rate imposed on the gross receipts for telecommunications service
shall be determined in accordance with Subsection (2)(b) if the location of a
transaction for telecommunications service is determined under Subsection (1)
to be a municipality other than the municipality in which is located:
(i)  for telecommunications service other than mobile telecommunications
service, the customer's service address; or
(ii)  for mobile telecommunications service, the customer's primary place of
use.
(b)  The rate imposed on the gross receipts for telecommunications service
described in Subsection (2)(a) shall be the lower of:
(i)  the rate imposed by the taxing jurisdiction in which the transaction is
located under Subsection (1); or
(ii)  the rate imposed by the municipality in which it is located:
(A)  for telecommunications service other than mobile telecommunications
service, the customer's service address; or
(B)  for mobile telecommunications service, the customer's primary place of
use.
